Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2924
Filing fees.

The filing fees for records filed under the Nebraska Limited Cooperative Association Act with the Secretary of State are governed by section 33-101. The fees for filings under the act shall be paid to the Secretary of State, and the Secretary of State shall remit the fees to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall credit sixty percent of the fees to the General Fund and forty percent of the fees to the Secretary of State Cash Fund.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 24;

Laws 2020, LB910, § 9.